da: Dundun-spilleposition: Gulvstøttet; Håndholdt; Stativmonteret; Under armen (talking drum-stil); Anden
hu: Dundun játékpozíciója: Padlón támaszkodó; Kézi; Állványra szerelt; Hónalj alatti (talking drum stílus); Egyéb
hr-HR: Igračka pozicija Dunduna: Oslonjeno na pod; Iz ruke; Montirano na stalak; Ispod pazuha (u stilu govorećeg bubnja); Ostalo
pt-PT: Posição de jogo em Dundun: Apoio no chão; Portátil; Montado em suporte; Debaixo do braço (estilo talking drum); Outro
en: Dundun playing position: Floor supported; Hand-held; Stand-mounted; Under-arm (talking drum style); Other
zh-CN: 墩墩鼓演奏姿势: 落地式; 手持式; 支架式; 腋下式（说话鼓风格）; 其他
ro-RO: Poziția de joc Dundun: Sprijinite pe podea; Ținute în mână; Montate pe stativ; Sub braț (stil talking drum); Altele
ru: Положение при игре на дундуне: Напольное; В руках; На стойке; Под мышкой (в стиле «говорящего» барабана); Другое
es: Posición de juego de Dununes: Apoyado en el suelo; Sostenido con la mano; Montado en soporte; Bajo el brazo (estilo tambor parlante); Otro
lt-LT: Dundun grojimo padėtis: Atremiamas į grindis; Laikomas rankose; Tvirtinamas ant stovo; Po pažastimi (kalbančio būgno stilius); Kita
tr: Dundun oyun pozisyonu: Zemin destekli; Elde tutulan; Standa monteli; Koltuk altı (konuşan davul stili); Diğer
fr: Position de jeu du dundun: Posé au sol; Tenu à la main; Monté sur pied; Sous le bras (style tama); Autre
sk-SK: Poloha hrania na dundun: S oporou na zemi; V ruke; Na stojane; Pod pazuchou (v štýle „talking drum“); Iné
nl: Dundun speelpositie: Vloerondersteund; In de hand; Op standaard; Onder de arm (talking drum-stijl); Anders
th: ตำแหน่งการวางกลองดุนดุนขณะเล่น: ตั้งพื้น; ถือด้วยมือ; ยึดติดขาตั้ง; หนีบใต้รักแร้ (สไตล์ Talking Drum); อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Позиция за свирене на дундун: На пода; В ръка; На стойка; Под мишница (стил „говорещ барабан“); Друго
nb: Dundun spillerposisjon: Gulvstøttet; Håndholdt; Stativmontert; Under armen (talking drum-stil); Annet
fi: Dundunin soittoasento: Lattialle tuettu; Kädessä pidettävä; Telineeseen kiinnitettävä; Käsivarren alla (talking drum -tyyli); Muu
de: Spielposition der Dundun: Auf dem Boden aufliegend; Handgehalten; Auf Stativ; Unter dem Arm (Talking-Drum-Stil); Sonstige
pl: Pozycja gry na dundunie: Oparty na podłodze; Trzymany w dłoni; Zamontowany na statywie; Pod ramieniem (styl "talking drum"); Inna
it: Posizione da giocatore del Dundun: Appoggiato a terra; Portatile; Montato su supporto; Sotto braccio (stile talking drum); Altro
vi: Vị trí chơi Dundun: Đặt trên sàn; Cầm tay; Gắn trên giá đỡ; Kẹp nách (kiểu talking drum); Khác
zh-TW: Dundun 演奏位置: 落地支撐; 手持; 支架固定; 腋下夾持 (說話鼓式); 其他
sv: Dunduns spelposition: Golvstödd; Handhållen; Stativmonterad; Under armen (talking drum-stil); Övrigt
ja: ダンダンのプレーポジション: 床置き; 手持ち; スタンド取り付け; 脇抱え (トーキングドラムスタイル); その他
sl-SI: Igralni položaj dunduna: Podprto na tleh; Ročno; Montirano na stojalo; Pod roko (slog govorečega bobna); Drugo
el: Θέση παιξίματος dundun: Με στήριξη στο πάτωμα; Στο χέρι; Σε βάση; Κάτω από τη μασχάλη (στυλ talking drum); Άλλο
cs: Dundun hrající pozice: Na podlaze; V ruce; Na stojanu; V podpaží (styl talking drum); Ostatní
pt-BR: Posição de execução do dundun: Apoiado no chão; De mão; Montado em suporte; Debaixo do braço (estilo tambor falante); Outra
ko: 던던 연주 위치: 바닥 지지형; 핸드헬드; 스탠드 장착형; 언더암 (토킹 드럼 스타일); 기타